Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 2. Proceedings

It must be presumed that grand jury followed court's instructions

as to its powers, duties and obligations and that each grand juror fully lived up to and observed his solemn oath, presumably administered in accordance with §

7-5-201

.Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Privilege against self-incrimination in regard to testimony before grand jury, 38 ALR2d 225.

Contempt by perjury or false swearing in proceedings before grand jury, 89 ALR2d 1258.

Accused's right to inspection of minutes of state grand jury, 20 ALR3d 7.

Refusal to answer questions before state grand jury as direct contempt of court, 69 ALR3d 501.

Individual's right to present complaint or evidence of criminal offense to grand jury, 24 ALR4th 316.

Propriety of blanket or per se rule prohibiting federal grand jury from indicting witness who has previously testified before same grand jury under grant of use immunity, 139 ALR Fed 489.

§ 7-5-201.
Appointment of foreman; oath of jurors.

The district judge shall appoint one (1) of the jurors to be foreman. The foreman is authorized to administer oaths to witnesses and shall sign indictments as provided by W.S.

7-5-104

.

Before entering upon their duties, an oath or affirmation shall be administered to the foreman and each of the jurors providing, in substance, that each of them will:

Diligently inquire into all matters coming before them;

Find and present indictments truthfully and without malice, fear of reprisal or hope of reward; and

Keep secret matters occurring before the grand jury unless disclosure is directed or permitted by the court.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 64; R.S. 1887, § 3223; R.S. 1899, § 5282; C.S. 1910, § 6146; C.S. 1920, § 7443; R.S. 1931, § 61-107; C.S. 1945, § 10-503; W.S. 1957, § 7-101; W.S. 1977, §

7-5-203

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to oaths generally, see chapter 2 of title 1.

Cited

in

Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to jurors, 18 ALR2d 268.

§ 7-5-202.
Charging of duties; powers.

After the grand jury is impaneled and sworn, the district judge shall charge the jurors as to their duties particularly to the obligation of secrecy which their oaths impose, and give them any information the court deems proper concerning any offenses known to the court and likely to come before the grand jury.

The grand jury may:

Inquire into any crimes committed or triable within the county and present them to the court by indictment; and

Investigate and report to the court concerning the condition of the county jail and the treatment of prisoners.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 66; R.S. 1887, § 3225; R.S. 1899, § 5284; C.S. 1910, § 6148; C.S. 1920, § 7445; R.S. 1931, § 61-109; C.S. 1945, § 10-505; W.S. 1957, § 7-103; W.S. 1977, §

7-5-205

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Sufficient if members understand elements of offenses. —

The several counts in the indictment encompassed the appropriate elements for the offenses charged, and, whatever instruction may have been given to the grand jury, it was apparent that its members did understand the elements of these offenses. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Continuing investigation after indictment deemed proper. —

A continuing grand jury investigation, even after the issuance of an indictment, is proper. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

Cited

in

McBride v. Union Pac. R.R., 3 Wyo. 247, 21 P. 687,

1889 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1889).

§ 7-5-203.
Right of district attorney to appear before jury; presence of other persons during deliberations.

The district attorney, or the deputy or assistant district attorney may appear before the grand jury for the purpose of:

Giving information relative to any matter under inquiry;

Giving requested advice upon any legal matter; and

Interrogating witnesses.

No person other than the grand jurors shall be present during the deliberations of the grand jury or when the jurors are voting.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 67; R.S. 1887, § 3226; R.S. 1899, § 5285; C.S. 1910, § 6149; C.S. 1920, § 7446; R.S. 1931, § 61-110; C.S. 1945, § 10-506; W.S. 1957, § 7-104; W.S. 1977, §

7-5-206

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Applied

in

Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statutes permitting grand jury witnesses to be accompanied by counsel, 90 ALR3d 1340.

Presence of unauthorized persons during state grand jury proceedings as affecting indictment, 23 ALR4th 397.

Propriety of appointing attorney for federal agency as special assistant United States attorney for grand jury proceeding in which agency is interested, 58 ALR Fed 696.

Presence of persons not authorized by Rule 6(d) of Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure during session of grand jury as warranting dismissal of indictment, 68 ALR Fed 798.

§ 7-5-204.
Process for witnesses.

If requested by the grand jury or the district attorney, the clerk of the court in which the jury is impaneled shall issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses to testify before the grand jury.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 68; R.S. 1887, § 3227; R.S. 1899, § 5286; C.S. 1910, § 6150; C.S. 1920, § 7447; R.S. 1931, § 61-111; C.S. 1945, § 10-507; W.S. 1957, § 7-105; W.S. 1977, §

7-5-207

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to subpoenas, see Rule 17, W.R. Cr. P.

§ 7-5-205.
Administration of oath or affirmation to witnesses.

Before any witness is examined by the grand jury, an oath or affirmation shall be administered to him by the foreman.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 69; R.S. 1887, § 3228; R.S. 1899, § 5287; C.S. 1910, § 6151; C.S. 1920, § 7448; R.S. 1931, § 61-112; C.S. 1945, § 10-508; W.S. 1957, § 7-106; W.S. 1977, §

7-5-208

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to oaths generally, see chapter 2 of title 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Failure to swear or irregularity in swearing witnesses appearing before grand jury as ground for dismissal of indictment, 23 ALR4th 154.

§ 7-5-206.
Proceedings upon refusal of witness to testify.

If a witness appearing before a grand jury refuses, without just cause shown, to testify or provide other information, the district attorney may take the witness before the court for an order directing the witness to show cause why the witness should not be held in contempt. If after hearing the court finds that the refusal was without just cause, and if the witness continues to refuse to testify or produce evidence, the court may hold the witness in contempt subject to the punishment provided by W.S. 1-12-108(a)(ii).

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 70; R.S. 1887, § 3229; R.S. 1899, § 5288; C.S. 1910, § 6152; C.S. 1920, § 7449; R.S. 1931, § 61-113; C.S. 1945, § 10-509; W.S. 1957, § 7-107; W.S. 1977, §

7-5-209

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Prosecutors have no authority to grant immunity. —

A prosecuting attorney (district attorney or county attorney) in Wyoming has no authority to grant immunity to a witness. Hall v. State, 851 P.2d 1262,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Privilege against self-incrimination in regard to testimony before grand jury, 38 ALR2d 225.

Validity and construction of statutes permitting grand jury witnesses to be accompanied by counsel, 90 ALR3d 1340.

§ 7-5-207.
Secrecy of indictments against persons not under control.

The district judge may direct that an indictment shall be kept secret until the defendant is in custody or has given bail, and in that event the clerk shall seal the indictment and no person shall disclose the finding of the indictment except when necessary for the issuance and execution of a warrant or summons.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 74; R.S. 1887, § 3233; R.S. 1899, § 5291; C.S. 1910, § 6155; C.S. 1920, § 7452; R.S. 1931, § 61-116; C.S. 1945, § 10-512; W.S. 1957, § 7-110; W.S. 1977, § 7-5-212; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

§ 7-5-208.
Confidentiality.

Disclosure of matters occurring before the grand jury, other than its deliberations and the vote of any juror, may be made to the district attorney for use in the performance of his duties. The district attorney may disclose so much of the grand jury’s proceeding to law enforcement agencies as he deems essential to the public interest and effective law enforcement.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, a juror, attorney, interpreter, stenographer, operator of a recording device or any typist who transcribes recorded testimony may disclose matters occurring before the grand jury only when so directed by the court preliminarily to or in connection with a judicial proceeding or when permitted by the court at the request of the defendant upon a showing that a particularized need exists for a motion to dismiss the indictment because of matters occurring before the grand jury.

No obligation of secrecy may be imposed upon any person except in accordance with this section and W.S.

7-5-207

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 75; R.S. 1887, § 3234; R.S. 1899, § 5992; C.S. 1910, § 6156; C.S. 1920, § 7453; R.S. 1931, § 61-117; C.S. 1945, § 10-513; W.S. 1957, § 7-111; W.S. 1977, § 7-5-213; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Competency of grand juror to testify in a criminal prosecution to a voluntary statement or confession made by the defendant before the grand jury, 38 ALR2d 225.

Discovery, in civil proceeding, of records of criminal investigation by state grand jury, 69 ALR4th 298.

Who are “government personnel” within meaning of Rule 6(a)(3)(A)(ii) of the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure to whom matters occurring before grand jury may be disclosed, 54 ALR Fed 805.

Right of party in civil action to obtain disclosure, under Rule 6(e)(3)(C)(i) of the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure, of matters occurring before grand jury, 71 ALR Fed 10.

Relief, remedy or sanction for violation of Rule 6(e) of Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure, prohibiting disclosure of matters occurring before grand jury, 73 ALR Fed 112.

§ 7-5-209.
Presentation and filing of indictment.

Indictments found by the grand jury shall be presented by the foreman to the court in the presence of the jury and filed with the clerk.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 80; R.S. 1887, § 3239; Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 131; R.S. 1899, § 5296; C.S. 1910, § 6160; C.S. 1920, § 7457; R.S. 1931, § 61-121; C.S. 1945, § 10-517; W.S. 1957, § 7-115; W.S. 1977, § 7-5-217; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to finding of indictment, see §

7-5-104

.